Idaho, session 2026, H0707.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
permit homeowners, builders, and lenders to separate ownership or financing
of land containing an approved or existing accessory dwelling unit or simi-
lar secondary structure without requiring a full subdivision process and to
allow individuals to more easily split lots so that mortgages or financing
can be accessed. It is the intent of the Legislature to resolve financing
barriers for permitted alternative accessory dwelling units and secondary
dwellings. It is not the intent of the Legislature to facilitate outward
development, subdivisions by another name, or agricultural land fragmenta-
tion.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 13, Title 50, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 50-1335, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
50-1335. DIVISION OF LAND -- ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS. (1) Notwith-
standing any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, cities or
counties may establish an administrative process for land division, which
shall not be subject to subdivision platting requirements, for the pur-
pose of facilitating a mortgage or financing division of land that contains
an existing or approved accessory dwelling unit or secondary residential
structure. The need for a mortgage or financing division of land shall be ev-
idenced by a letter from a lender or mortgage underwriter demonstrating that
parcel separation is required for financing. Such process may be used if:
(a) The division is solely for mortgage or financing purposes and does
not create additional residential entitlements or increase allowable
density beyond what is permitted by applicable zoning regulations;
(b) The division does not authorize additional dwelling units or fur-
ther land divisions on either parcel created by the division and the di-
vision attaches to the original parcel and runs with the land; and
(c) Each resulting parcel has adequate legal access and utility service
in accordance with applicable local standards.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit serial or re-
cursive division through conveyance, reconfiguration, or recombination and
re-split methods.


(3) Divisions made pursuant to the process provided in this section
shall be recorded with the county recorder and shall include a declaration
restricting further division or development inconsistent with this section.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or supersede
agricultural protections provided for bona fide divisions of agricultural
land under this chapter or to authorize the creation of new building lots in
violation of local zoning or density standards.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.